Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6364.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4506. Bonds issued under this part are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501, and the bonds and the interest on the bonds are exempt from all taxation by the this state or any of its political subdivisions.subdivision of this state. Sec. 19504. Bonds issued under former Act No. 326 of the Public Acts of 1988 PA 326 or part 193 shall be are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501. The bonds and the interest on the bonds shall be are exempt from all taxation by the this state or any political subdivisions of the state.subdivision of this state. Sec. 19604. The bonds shall be are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102. 440.12501. The bonds and the interest on the bonds shall be are exempt from all taxation by the this state or any political subdivision of the this state. Sec. 19704. The bonds shall be are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102. 440.12501. The bonds and the interest on the bonds shall be are exempt from all taxation by the this state or any political subdivision of the this state. Sec. 50165. (1) The This state pledges and agrees with the holders of bonds issued under this part that the this state will not limit or alter the rights vested in a district to fulfill the terms of agreements made with the holders of bonds or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds, together with the interest on the bonds, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. A district shall include this the pledge and agreement of the this state in each agreement with the holders of the bonds. (2) The bonds authorized to be issued by this part are negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501, subject only to the provisions of the bonds for registration. (3) The bonds of a district are securities in which each public officer or body of the this state and each political subdivision of the this state; each insurance company and association and any other person carrying on an insurance business; each bank, trust company, savings bank and savings association, savings and loan association, or investment company; each administrator, guardian, executor, trustee, or other fiduciary; and any other person who that is authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the this state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, which are either owned or controlled by the person or other entity. Sec. 71504. Bonds issued under part 713 shall be are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501. The bonds and the interest on the bonds shall be are exempt from all taxation by the this state or any political subdivision of the this state. Sec. 80320. (1) A party with a secured interest in a watercraft, upon on presentation of a properly completed application for certificate of title to the secretary of state, together with the fee prescribed by section 80311, may have a notation of the security interest made on the face of the certificate of title to be issued by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall enter the notation and the date and shall note the security interest and the date in his or her the secretary of state's files. However, as provided in subsection (5), the secretary of state is not required to issue a certificate of title to the owner of a vehicle if the title is subject to a security interest. (2) When the security interest is discharged, the holder shall note the discharge on the certificate of title over his or her the holder's signature. (3) Receipt by the secretary of state of a properly tendered application for a certificate of title on which a security interest in a watercraft is to be indicated is a condition of perfection of a security interest in the watercraft, unless, under subsection (4), the department of state does not issue certificates of title for watercraft subject to a security interest, and is equivalent to filing a financing statement under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994, 440.12501, with respect to the watercraft. When a security interest in a watercraft is perfected, it the security interest has priority over the rights of a lien creditor. as lien creditor is As used in this subsection, "lien creditor" means that term as defined in section 9102 of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.9102. (4) The department of state may require that all transactions concerning watercraft title liens and security interests be conducted by electronic means, as determined by the department of state. In that case, if a watercraft is subject to a security interest, the department of state is not required to issue a certificate of title to the owner of the watercraft or a lienholder if it the department of state maintains a record of title electronically. After all liens have been terminated, or for purposes of retitling the watercraft in another state or any other purpose considered appropriate by the department of state, the department of state may issue a paper copy of the watercraft title to the watercraft owner. (5) A watercraft sale transaction in which a security interest is entered by electronic means shall must include a document recording entry of the electronic security interest and information regarding the financial institution that holds the security interest. When a secured party is presented with payment in satisfaction of the security interest, a secured receipt in a form approved by the department of state may be produced and submitted to the department of state in lieu instead of the certificate of title for purposes of transferring ownership in the watercraft. Sec. 81108. (1) An application for an ORV certificate of title shall must be on a form prescribed by the department of state. The application shall must include a certification. The owner or purchaser shall sign the application or, if the application is filed electronically, provide information requested by the department of state to verify the owner's identity. The application shall must contain, in addition to other information required by the department of state, all of the following information: (a) The applicant's name and address. (b) A statement of any security interest or other liens on the ORV, along with the name and address of any lienholder. (c) If a lien is not outstanding, a statement of that fact. (d) A description of the ORV, including the year, make, model or series, and vehicle identification number. (2) An application for an ORV certificate of title that indicates the existence of a security interest in the ORV shall, must, if requested by the security interest holder, be accompanied by a copy of the security agreement, which may be unsigned. The department of state shall indicate on the copy the date and place of filing and shall return the copy to the person who that filed the application. The filer shall forward the copy to the security interest holder identified in the application. (3) Receipt by the secretary of state of a properly tendered application for an ORV certificate of title that indicates the existence of a security interest in the ORV is a condition of perfection of a security interest in the ORV, unless, under section 81109(5), the department of state does not issue certificates of title for ORVs subject to a security interest, and is equivalent to filing a financing statement under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994, 440.12501, with respect to the ORV. When a security interest in an ORV is perfected, it the security interest has priority over the rights of a lien creditor. as lien creditor is As used in this subsection, "lien creditor" means that term as defined in section 9102 of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.9102. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.